Hawaii statutes.
§171-9 Land districts. For the
purposes of this chapter the State is divided into the following land
districts:

First land district: The island of Hawaii and
the reefs and reef lands off the shores of the island of Hawaii.

Second land district: The islands of Maui,
Molokai, Lanai, Kahoolawe, and Molokini and the reefs and reef lands off the
shores of these islands.

Third land district: The island of Oahu and
all other islands and reefs in the State of Hawaii not included in the other
districts.

Fourth land district: The islands of Kauai,
Niihau, Lehua, and Kaula, and the reefs and reef lands off the shores of these
islands. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-9; HRS §171-9]

Cross References

Districts, generally, see §4-1.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next